Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1869.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Made in PA Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Fund." The Made in PA Fund established under section 8."Made in PA logo." One or more logos developed by the department that:12345678910111213141516171819 (1) consist of the phrase "Made in PA" or "Made in Pennsylvania"; and(2) may include specific graphic designs or artwork as part of the program."Member." A qualified entity that is subject to a current Made in PA membership agreement with the department."Pennsylvania-made commodity." Tangible products that are produced, manufactured or assembled in this Commonwealth by a business and are transported or intended to be transported in commerce."Program." The Made in PA Program."Qualified entity." A business that:(1) offers a Pennsylvania-made commodity that has been produced, manufactured or assembled by the business;(2) has a physical business location within this Commonwealth; and(3) is in good standing with the Department of Revenue and is current on all State taxes.Section 3. Made in PA Program.(a) Establishment.--The Made in PA Program is established in the department. The department shall administer the program in accordance with this act.(b) Made in PA logo trademark.--The department shall take the actions necessary and appropriate to create, register, maintain, license, promote and protect a Made in PA logo trademark. The trademarked logo may be used in connection with the sale, marketing and promotion of a member's Pennsylvania-made commodity under the member's membership agreement with the department.Section 4. Member qualification.20250HB1869PN2322 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 To become a member, a business must:(1) submit an application on a form provided by the department;(2) receive certification from the department that the member is a qualified entity;(3) meet any other qualifications deemed necessary by the department; and(4) enter into a membership agreement with the department.Section 5. Duties and authority of department.(a) Authority to enter into Made in PA membership agreements.--The department:(1) Shall enter into a membership agreement with a business which qualifies for membership under section 4.(2) May periodically review a membership agreement to determine if the terms are being met.(3) May unilaterally terminate any membership agreement upon a determination that the membership agreement has been violated by the member.(b) Cooperative activities.--(1) The department may engage in cooperative activities to implement and advance the purposes of this act. The department, in coordination with the Department of Agriculture, shall administer the programs authorized by this act and 3 Pa.C.S. Ch. 46 (relating to Pennsylvania Preferred® Trademark) and shall work jointly in the furtherance of the interests of manufacturing and agriculture in this Commonwealth.(2) Nothing contained in this act may be construed to supersede or restrict the provisions of 3 Pa.C.S. Ch. 46 and 20250HB1869PN2322 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the duties and operations of the Department of Agriculture.(c) Public information Internet website.--(1) The department shall compile a list of members. The list shall be made available to the public on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and for other public distribution as the department approves.(2) The list compiled under paragraph (1) shall be updated every three months and include:(i) the Pennsylvania-made commodity offered;(ii) contact information for the member that may include an Internet website link; and(iii) one or more methods through which the Pennsylvania-made commodity may be purchased.Section 6. Membership agreement process.A membership agreement under this act shall be effective for one year from the date upon which the membership agreement is executed and may be renewed. The membership agreement shall allow a member to terminate the membership agreement upon 60 days' advance written notice to the department.Section 7. Costs and fees.(a) Membership fee.--The department may charge an annual fee to businesses that are members in the program.(b) Charge for costs.--The department may charge a member for costs incurred by the department in connection with the member's participation in an activity, trade show, exhibition or other promotional event conducted or facilitated by the department. The charge shall reasonably reflect the costs incurred by the department in facilitating the member's participation and may include the costs as proportional shares of event registration fees, equipment rental fees, display area 20250HB1869PN2322 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 rental fees and related costs.(c) Cost of promotional materials.--The department may charge a member for costs of program promotional materials provided by the department at the request of the member.Section 8. Made in PA Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Made in PA Fund is established in the State Treasury. The following money shall be deposited into the fund:(1) Money appropriated or given for the purpose established under this act by the Federal Government, the Commonwealth, any other government agency or any private or public entity or person.(2) Money derived from the costs and fees established under section 7.(3) Money derived from civil penalties collected by the department under section 9.(4) Interest and earnings received from investment or deposit of money in the fund.(b) Nonlapsing fund.--Money in the fund is appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for the purpose of this act. The interest and earnings received from investment or deposit of the money in the fund shall be paid into the account for the purpose authorized by this section. Unexpended money and interest or earnings on the money in the fund may not be transferred or revert to the General Fund, but shall remain in the account to be used by the department for the purpose specified under this section.(c) Use.--Money deposited into the fund shall be used to:(1) promote Pennsylvania-made commodities;(2) promote Made in PA as an identification of origin 20250HB1869PN2322 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and quality;(3) promote Pennsylvania-made commodities with respect to which the Made in PA logo is licensed;(4) pay costs associated with monitoring the use of the Made in PA logo to prohibit the unlawful or unauthorized use of the Made in PA logo and enforcing rights of the Made in PA logo; and(5) otherwise fund the department's costs in administering and enforcing this act.(d) Program suspension.--The duty of the department to administer this act shall be suspended if and so long as the fund no longer contains sufficient revenues to administer the program.Section 9. Civil penalties.In addition to any other remedy available at law or in equity for a violation of a provision of this act or a membership agreement established under this act, the department may assess a civil penalty upon the person or entity responsible for the violation. The civil penalty assessed may not exceed $10,000 and shall be payable to the Commonwealth and collectible in a manner provided under law for the collection of debt.Section 10. Injunctive relief.(a) Action in equity.--In addition to the other remedies provided under this act, the Attorney General, at the request of the department, may initiate, in Commonwealth Court or the court of common pleas of the county in which the defendant resides or has his place of business, an action in equity for an injunction to restrain violations of this act or a membership agreement.(b) Preliminary injunction.--(1) In the proceeding, the court shall, upon motion of 20250HB1869PN2322 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Commonwealth, issue a preliminary injunction if the court finds the defendant is engaging in unlawful conduct under this act or is engaging in conduct that is causing immediate or irreparable harm to the public.(2) The court may not require the Commonwealth to furnish bond or other security in connection with the proceedings.(c) Other relief.--In addition to an injunction, the court, in the proceeding, may levy civil penalties as provided under section 9.Section 11. Rules and regulations.The department may issue rules and promulgate regulations necessary to promote the efficient, uniform and Statewide administration of this act. Every two years from the effective date of this section, the department shall promulgate, adopt and use guidelines to implement the provisions of this act. Guidelines shall be transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin but are not subject to review under section 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law, sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act, or the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.Section 12. Reports.One year after the effective date of this section and each year on that date, the department shall issue a report to the Governor and the General Assembly on the general operation of the program, how the program has impacted this Commonwealth and other information the department deems necessary and 20250HB1869PN2322 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appropriate.Section 13. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1869PN2322 - 8 - 123